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DTC C 1549 / 49 Vehicle Skid Control System Commu-
nication Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The VGRS ECU communicates with the skid control ECU. However, if any problems in this communication
occur, the VGRS ECU turns on the warning light, records the DTC and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1549/49
The system detects a communication malfunction from the
skid control ECU for 3 seconds.

SWireharnessandconnector
SVGRSECU
SSkidcontrolECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthesignalwaveform.

PREPARATION:
Start theengine.
CHECK:
(a) Using an oscilloscope, check the waveform between

VSC+ and GND of the VGRS ECU.
OK:

High and Low

(b) Using an oscilloscope, check the waveform between
VSC− andGNDof theVGRSECU.

OK:
High and Low

OK Replace VGRS ECU.

NG

Proceed to step 2



F17863
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2 Check for an open or short circuit in the harness and connector between termi-
nalsVSC+andVSC − of theVGRSECU,andbetweenterminalsVSC+andVSC −
of the skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b)Disconnect theVGRSECUconnector (V17)and theskid

control ECU connector (A55).
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminal VSC+ and VSC − of the
VGRSECUandskidcontrolECU.
OK:

Continuity

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

3Checkforashort togroundin theVSC+andVSC − circuit.

OK:
No short to ground.

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

Replace skid control ECU.


